Georgia, session 2025_26, HB265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
9 SECTION 1.
10 Chapter 23 of Title 2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the "Georgia Hemp
11 Farming Act," is amended by revising Code Section 2-23-3, relating to definitions, as
12 follows:
13 "2-23-3.
14 As used in this chapter, the term:
15 (1) 'Attractive to children' means the use of any characters or symbols designed to
16 appeal, or would likely appeal, primarily to individuals under 21 years of age, including
H. B. 265
- 1 -

25 LC 55 0397
17 but not limited to anthropomorphized animals, creatures, promotional characters, licensed
18 characters, or inanimate objects; depictions of children; or depictions of candy.
19 (2) 'Commercial sale' means the sale of products in the stream of commerce at retail, at
20 wholesale, and online.
21 (3) 'Consumable hemp product' means a hemp product intended to be ingested, absorbed,
22 or inhaled by humans or animals.
23 (4) 'Contaminant' means a foreign substance or compound that may, if ingested,
24 absorbed, or inhaled, have an adverse effect on the health of a human or animal. Such
25 term shall include, without limitation, heavy metals, pesticide residues, residual solvents
26 or processing chemicals, and any other substance or compound that the department
27 determines could, if ingested, absorbed, or inhaled, have an adverse effect on the health
28 of a human or animal.
29 (5) 'Cultivate' means to plant, water, grow, and harvest a plant or crop.
30 (6) 'Delta-9-THC' means delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol.
31 (7) 'Delta-9-THCA' means delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinolic acid.
32 (8) Reserved.
33 (9) 'Full panel certificate of analysis' means a report, produced by a laboratory which is
34 unaffiliated with the processor or manufacturer and which has been accredited pursuant
35 to the standards of the International Organization for Standardization for the competence,
36 impartiality, and consistent operation of laboratories, attesting to the composition of a
37 product.
38 (10) 'Handle' means to possess or store hemp plants for any period of time other than
39 during the actual transport of such plants from the premises of a person licensed to
40 cultivate or permitted to process hemp or a college or university authorized to conduct
41 research pursuant to Code Section 2-23-4 to the premises of another licensed or permitted
42 person or to a college or university authorized to conduct research pursuant to Code
H. B. 265
- 2 -

25 LC 55 0397
43 Section 2-23-4; provided, however, that such term shall not include possessing or storing
44 finished hemp products.
45 (11) 'Hemp' means the Cannabis sativa L. plant and any part of such plant, including the
46 seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts
47 of isomers, whether growing or not, with a total delta-9-THC concentration that does not
48 exceed the legal limit.
49 (12) 'Hemp grower licensee' means an individual or business entity possessing a hemp
50 grower license issued by the department under the authority of this chapter to handle and
51 cultivate hemp in the State of Georgia.
52 (13) 'Hemp products' means all products with a total delta-9-THC concentration that does
53 not exceed the legal limit that are derived from, or made by, processing hemp plants or
54 plant parts and that are prepared in a form available for commercial sale.
55 (14) 'Industrial hemp product' means any hemp product that is not a consumable hemp
56 product.
57 (15) 'Key participant' means a sole proprietor, a partner in a partnership, or a person with
58 executive managerial control in a corporation when such sole proprietor, partnership, or
59 corporation is an applicant to be a hemp grower licensee or a permittee. A person with
60 executive managerial control in a corporation includes persons serving as a chief
61 executive officer, chief operating officer, chief financial officer, or any other individual
62 identified in regulations promulgated by the department. Such term shall not include
63 nonexecutive managers, such as farm, field, or shift managers.
64 (16) 'Legal limit' means a total delta-9-THC concentration that is the lesser of:
65 (A) 0.3 percent; or
66 (B) The percentage limit set forth in 7 U.S.C. Section 1639o.
67 (17) 'Licensee' means an individual or business entity possessing a license issued by the
68 department under the authority of this chapter.
69 (18) 'Manufacture' means to create, produce, manipulate, combine, or package.
H. B. 265
- 3 -

25 LC 55 0397
70 (19) 'Manufacturer license' means a license issued by the department under the authority
71 of this chapter to an individual or business entity that manufactures consumable hemp
72 products or industrial hemp products in this state.
73 (20) 'Measurement of uncertainty' means the parameter, associated with the result of a
74 measurement, that characterizes the dispersion of the values that could reasonably be
75 attributed to the particular quantity subject to measurement.
76 (21) 'Permittee' means an individual or business entity possessing a hemp processor
77 permit issued by the department under the authority of this chapter to handle and process
78 hemp in the State of Georgia.
79 (22)(A) 'Process' or 'processing,' except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B) of
80 this paragraph, means converting an agricultural commodity into a legally marketable
81 form.
82 (B) Such term shall not include:
83 (i) Merely placing raw or dried material into another container or packaging raw or
84 dried material for resale; or
85 (ii) Traditional farming practices such as those commonly known as drying, shucking
86 and bucking, storing, trimming, and curing.
87 (23) 'QR code' means a quick response code that is a type of machine-readable,
88 two-dimensional barcode that stores information about a product.
89 (24) 'Registered laboratory' means an individual or business entity that tests or analyzes
90 any plant within the genus Cannabis, including but not limited to hemp, and products
91 made from or derived from such plant, including but not limited to hemp products and
92 consumable hemp products, and that has registered with the department under this
93 chapter.
94 (25) 'Research' or 'researching' means experimental field, greenhouse, or laboratory
95 activity for the ultimate purpose of developing new hemp varieties and products,
H. B. 265
- 4 -

25 LC 55 0397
96 improving existing hemp products, developing new uses for existing hemp products, or
97 developing or improving methods for producing hemp products.
98 (26) 'Retail consumable hemp establishment license' means a license issued by the
99 department under the authority of this chapter to an individual or business entity that
100 prepares or sells prepackaged consumable hemp products to consumers.
101 (27) 'THC' means tetrahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, or a combination
102 of tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid.
103 (28) 'THC and other intoxicating cannabinoids' means and includes:
104 (A) THC and any isomers, derivatives, salts, isomers of salts, analogues, halogen
105 analogues, or homologues of THC, including, but not limited to,
106 delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-8-THC), delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol
107 (delta-9-THC), delta-10-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-10-THC),
108 delta-11-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-11-THC), tetrahydrocannabinolic acid (THCA),
109 exo-tetrahydrocannabinol (exo-THC), THC-O-acetate (THC-OA), THC-O-phosphate
110 (THC-O), tetrahydrocannabiphorol (THCP), tetrahydrocannabivarin (THCV),
111 tetrahydrocannabihexol (THCH), tetrahydrocannabioctyl (THCJD), and
112 tetrahydrocannabutol (THCB);
113 (B) Cannabinol (CBN) and any isomers, derivatives, salts, isomers of salts, analogues,
114 halogen analogues, or homologues of CBN; and
115 (C) Hexahydrocannabinol (HHC) and any isomers, derivatives, salts, isomers of salts,
116 analogues, halogen analogues, or homologues of HHC.
117 (29) 'Total concentration of THC and other intoxicating cannabinoids' means the
118 concentration of all THC and other intoxicating cannabinoids within a sample.
119 (28)(30) 'Total delta-9-THC concentration' means a concentration of delta-9-THC as
120 determined by Code Section 2-23-3.1.
H. B. 265
- 5 -

25 LC 55 0397
121 (29)(31) 'Wholesale consumable hemp license' means a license issued by the department
122 under the authority of this chapter to an individual or business entity that sells, in bulk,
123 prepackaged consumable hemp products to retail consumable hemp establishment
124 licensees or to other retail establishments located outside of the State of Georgia that are
125 authorized to sell consumable hemp products to consumers in the jurisdiction where such
126 establishments are located."
127 SECTION 2.
128 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 2-23-9.1, relating to consumable
129 hemp products, certificate of analysis, THC warning, and inspections, as follows:
130 "2-23-9.1.
131 (a) No consumable hemp product shall be sold or otherwise distributed in this state if such
132 product has a total concentration of THC and other intoxicating cannabinoids that exceeds
133 0.3 percent, determined on a dry weight basis where applicable.
134 (b) No consumable hemp product shall be sold or otherwise distributed in this state unless
135 the processor or manufacturer has, within the last 12 months, contracted for a full panel
136 certificate of analysis to be conducted on such product and such analysis has been
137 conducted and made available to the public. Such full panel certificate of analysis shall,
138 at a minimum:
139 (1) Attest to the presence and amount, in such product's final packaged form, of the
140 following compounds or groups of compounds:
141 (A) THC and other intoxicating cannabinoids;
142 (B) Cannabidiol (CBD);
143 (C) Cannabidiolic acid (CBDA);
144 (D) Cannabigerol (CBG);
145 (E) Cannabigerolic acid (CBGA); and
146 (F) Cannabinol (CBN);
H. B. 265
- 6 -

25 LC 55 0397
147 (G) Hexahydrocannabinol (HHC); and
148 (H)(F) Any other compound or groups of compounds that the department determines
149 is necessary to protect the health and safety of consumers; and
150 (2) Attest that the product, in its final packaged form, does not contain any contaminants
151 in excess of the maximum levels established by the department. In establishing such
152 maximum levels, the department shall consider the American Herbal Pharmacopoeia
153 monographs or such other scientific resources that the department determines is accurate,
154 reliable, and relevant.
155 (b)(c) Any consumable hemp product sold or otherwise distributed in this state shall bear:
156 (1) A sticker, approved by the department, warning potential consumers that such
157 product contains THC and other intoxicating cannabinoids; and
158 (2) A conspicuous label providing the information from the full panel certificate of
159 analysis conducted on such product within the last 12 months pursuant to subsection (a)
160 (b) of this Code section or allowing a consumer to access such information using a QR
161 code.
162 (c)(d) The department shall randomly inspect and test consumable hemp products
163 available for purchase at retail establishments to ensure compliance with this Code section.
164 Such investigations and testing shall be conducted in compliance with this chapter and with
165 the rules and regulations promulgated by the department.
166 (d)(e) In the event that an inspection or test of a consumable hemp product conducted by
167 the department pursuant to subsection (c) (d) of this Code section reveals that such product:
168 (1) Does not bear:
169 (A) The sticker required under paragraph (1) of subsection (b) (c) of this Code section;
170 or
171 (B) The label required under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) (c) of this Code section;
172 (2) Has a total delta-9-THC concentration that exceeds the legal limit;
H. B. 265
- 7 -

25 LC 55 0397
173 (3) Has a total concentration of THC and other intoxicating cannabinoids that exceeds
174 0.3 percent;
175 (3)(4) Contains one or more contaminants in excess of the maximum levels established
176 by the department; or
177 (4)(5) Has a composition that is materially different from what is shown on the full panel
178 certificate of analysis conducted on such product within the last 12 months pursuant to
179 subsection (a) (b) of this Code section,
180 such product and all related consumable hemp products shall be disposed of in compliance
181 with this chapter and with the rules and regulations promulgated by the department.
182 (e)(f) Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (a), (b), or (b) (c) of this Code
183 section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor."
184 SECTION 3.
185 Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 2-23-9.2, relating to consumable hemp
186 products, packaging, and advertising, by revising subsection (c) as follows:
187 "(c)(1) As used in this subsection, the term:
188 (A) 'Food product' means any product intended to be consumed by humans for physical
189 subsistence; provided, however, that such term shall not include products that constitute
190 drinks or beverages.
191 (B) 'Gummy' means a gelatinous substance in the form of a cube, sphere, prismatoid,
192 ovoid, or other shape that is designed for human ingestion.
193 (2) No consumable hemp product shall be sold or otherwise distributed in this state if
194 such product constitutes or is a component of:
195 (A) A food product; or
196 (B) A drink or beverage that contains alcohol or constitutes an alcoholic beverage
197 under Title 3.
H. B. 265
- 8 -

25 LC 55 0397
198 (3) Nothing in this subsection paragraph is intended to prohibit the sale or distribution
199 of hemp that is contained within gummies or consumable base oils, provided that such
200 gummies or consumable base oils are not a component of a food product.
201 (3) No consumable hemp product in the form of a gummy shall be sold or otherwise
202 distributed in this state unless such product has no more than five milligrams of THC and
203 other intoxicating cannabinoids per serving and, if such product is sold or otherwise
204 distributed in a container with more than one serving, no more than 150 milligrams of
205 THC and other intoxicating cannabinoids per container."
206 SECTION 4.
207 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 265
- 9 -